Texas statutes.
PROPERTY CODE

TITLE 5. EXEMPT PROPERTY AND LIENS

SUBTITLE A. PROPERTY EXEMPT FROM CREDITORS' CLAIMS

CHAPTER 43. EXEMPT PUBLIC PROPERTY

Sec. 43.001. EXEMPT PUBLIC LIBRARY. A public library is exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3525, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 43.002. EXEMPT PROPERTY. The real property of the state, including the real property held in the name of state agencies and funds, and the real property of a political subdivision of the state are exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale. A judgment lien or abstract of judgment may not be filed or perfected against the state, a unit of state government, or a political subdivision of the state on property owned by the state, a unit of state government, or a political subdivision of the state; any such judgment lien or abstract of judgment is void and unenforceable.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 159, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 1997.